Utah statutes.
17-36-50.   Reserve fund for capital improvements -- Use for projects other than originally specified -- Special election.

(1)  The legislative body of any county may submit the proposition of using funds in a reserve fund established under Section 17-36-46 for projects other than originally specified to the electors of the county at a special election if the projects are for the purposes set forth in Section 17-36-46.

(2)  If a proposition under Subsection (1) is proposed, the county legislative body shall fix a time and place for a special election on the proposition, to be held as provided by law.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

